Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Chapter 11. Implied Consent Law
§ 63-11-31.
Interlock restricted license; ignition interlock device; impoundment or immobilization of vehicles; use of Interlock Device Fund to offset cost of device installation and operation by indigent offenders; reinstatement of license without interlock restriction.

[Effective from and after July 1, 2020, this section will read:]

The provisions of this section are supplemental to the provisions of Section 63-11-30.

(i) “Ignition-interlock device” means a device approved by the Department of Public Safety that connects a motor vehicle ignition system to a breath-alcohol analyzer and prevents a motor vehicle ignition from starting if the driver’s blood alcohol level exceeds the calibrated setting on the device.

“Interlock-restricted license” means a driver’s license bearing a restriction that limits the person to operation of vehicles equipped with an ignition-interlock device.

“Court-ordered drug-testing program” means a program that qualifies under Section 63-11-31.1.

A person who can exercise the privilege of driving only under an interlock-restricted license must have an ignition-interlock device installed and operating on all motor vehicles owned or operated by the person.

A person who installs an ignition-interlock device may obtain an interlock-restricted license.

(i) The cost of installation and operation of an ignition-interlock device shall be borne by the person to whom an interlock-restricted driver’s license is issued, and the costs of court-ordered drug testing shall be borne by the person so ordered, unless the person is determined by the court to be indigent.

The cost of participating in a court-ordered drug-testing program shall be borne by the person, unless the person is determined by the court to be indigent.

(i) A person convicted under Section 63-11-30 shall be assessed by the court, in addition to the criminal fines, penalties and assessments provided by law for violations of Section 63-11-30, a fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00), to be deposited in theInterlock Device Fund in the State Treasury unless the person is determined by the court to be indigent.

A person nonadjudicated under Section 63-11-30 shall be assessed by the court, in addition to the criminal fines, penalties and assessments provided by law for violations of Section 63-11-30, a fee of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) to be deposited in the Interlock Device Fund in the State Treasury unless the person is determined by the court to be indigent.

The Department of Public Safety shall promulgate rules and regulations for the use of an ignition-interlock device. The Department of Public Safety shall approve which vendors shall be used to furnish the systems, may assess fees to the vendors, and shall prescribe the maximum costs to the offender for installation, removal, monthly operation, periodic inspections, calibrations and repairs.

A person who has an ignition-interlock device installed in a vehicle shall:

Provide proof of the installation of the device and periodic reporting for verification of the proper operation of the device;

Have the system monitored for proper use and accuracy as required by departmental regulation;

Pay the reasonable cost of leasing or buying, monitoring, and maintaining the device unless the person is determined to be indigent; and

Obtain an ignition-interlock driver’s license.

(i) A person who is limited to driving only under an interlock-restricted driver’s license shall not operate a vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition-interlock device.

A person prohibited from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition-interlock device may not solicit or have another person attempt to start or start a motor vehicle equipped with such a device.

A person may not start or attempt to start a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition-interlock device for the purpose of providing an operable motor vehicle to a person who is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition-interlock device.

A person may not tamper with, or in any way attempt to circumvent, the operation of an ignition-interlock device that has been installed in a motor vehicle.

A person may not knowingly provide a motor vehicle not equipped with a functioning ignition-interlock device to another person who the provider of the vehicle knows or should know is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle not equipped with an ignition-interlock device.

A violation of this subsection (4) is a misdemeanor and upon conviction the violator shall be fined an amount not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both, unless the starting of a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition-interlock device is done for the purpose of safety or mechanical repair of the device or the vehicle, and the person subject to the restriction does not operate the vehicle.

In order to obtain an interlock-restricted license, a person must:

Be otherwise qualified to operate a motor vehicle, and will be subject to all other restrictions on the privilege to drive provided by law;

Submit proof that an ignition-interlock device is installed and operating on all motor vehicles operated by the person; and

Pay the fee set forth in Section 63-1-43 to obtain the license without regard to indigence; no license reinstatement fee under Section 63-1-46 shall be charged for a person obtaining an interlock-restricted license.

In addition to the penalties authorized for any second or subsequent conviction under Section 63-11-30, the court shall order that all vehicles owned by the offender that are not equipped with an ignition-interlock device must be either impounded or immobilized pending further order of the court lifting the offender’s driving restriction. However, no county, municipality, sheriff’s department or the Department of Public Safety shall be required to keep, store, maintain, serve as a bailee or otherwise exercise custody over a motor vehicle impounded under the provisions of this section. The cost associated with any impoundment or immobilization shall be paid by the person convicted without regard to ability to pay.

A person may not tamper with, or in any way attempt to circumvent, vehicle immobilization or impoundment ordered by the court under this section. A violation of this paragraph (b) is a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, the violator shall be fined an amount not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

The Department of Public Safety shall promulgate rules and regulations for the use of monies in the Interlock Device Fund to offset the cost of interlock device installation and operation by and court-ordered drug testing of indigent offenders.

The court shall determine a defendant’s indigence based upon whether the defendant has access to adequate resources to pay the ignition-interlock fee and the costs of installation and maintenance of an ignition-interlock device, or the costs of court-ordered drug testing or both, and may further base the determination of indigence on proof of enrollment in one or more of the following types of public assistance:

Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF);

Medicaid assistance;

The Supplemental Nutritional Assistance Program (SNAP), also known as “food stamps”;

Supplemental security income (SSI);

Participation in a federal food distribution program;

Federal housing assistance;

Unemployment compensation; or

Other criteria determined appropriate by the court.

No more than ten percent (10%) of the money in the Interlock Device Fund in any fiscal year shall be expended by the department for the purpose of administering the fund.

The Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety must promulgate regulations for the program and for vendors, including at a minimum:

That the offender must pay the cost of the testing program or, if the court finds the offender to be indigent, that the cost be paid from the Interlock Device Fund.

How indigent funds will be accessed by the vendors, and the maximum cost to the offender or the fund.

(i) Money in the Interlock Device Fund will be appropriated to the department to cover part of the costs of court-ordered drug testing and installing, removing and leasing ignition-interlock devices for indigent people who are required, because of a conviction or nonadjudication under Section 63-11-30, to install an ignition-interlock device in all vehicles operated by the person.

If money is available in the Interlock Device Fund, the department shall pay to the vendor, for one (1) vehicle per offender, up to Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for the cost of installation, up to Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for the cost of removal, and up to Thirty Dollars ($30.00) monthly for verified active usage of the ignition-interlock device. The department shall not pay any amount above what an offender would be required to pay for the installation, removal or usage of an ignition-interlock device.

If money is available in the Interlock Device Fund, the department shall pay to the vendor an amount not to exceed that promulgated by the Forensics Laboratory for court-ordered drug testing. The department shall not pay any amount above what an offender would be required to pay individually.

In order to reinstate a form of driver’s license that is not restricted to operation of an ignition-interlock equipped vehicle, the person must submit proof to the Department of Public Safety to substantiate the person’s eligibility for an unrestricted license, which may be a court order indicating completion of sentence or final order of nonadjudication; in the absence of a court order, the proof may consist of the following or such other proof as the commissioner may set forth by regulation duly adopted under the Administrative Procedures Act:

Proof of successful completion of an alcohol safety program as provided in Section 63-11-32 if so ordered by the court;

Payment of the reinstatement fee required under Section 63-1-46(1)(a);

Payment of the driver’s license fee required under Section 63-1-43;

A certificate of liability insurance or proof of financial responsibility; and

(i) For those driving under an interlock-restricted license, a declaration from the vendor, in a form provided or approved by the Department of Public Safety, certifying that there have been none of the following incidents in the last thirty (30) days:

1. An attempt to start the vehicle with a breath alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more;

2. Failure to take or pass any required retest; or

3. Failure of the person to appear at the ignition-interlock device vendor when required for maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or replacement of the device; or

For a person who violated Section 63-11-30 with respect to drugs other than alcohol, proof of successful compliance with all court-ordered drug testing; or

Both subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (e) if applicable.

The court may extend the interlock-restricted period if the person had a violation in the last thirty (30) days.

The court that originally ordered installation of the ignition-interlock device for a violation of Section 63-11-30 and a court in the municipality or county in which the violation occurred have jurisdiction over an offense under this section.

A person who voluntarily obtains an interlock-restricted license may convert at any time to any other form of license for which the person is qualified.

The Department of Public Safety shall require all manufacturers of ignition-interlock devices to report ignition-interlock data in a consistent and uniform format as prescribed by the Department of Public Safety. Ignition-interlock vendors must also use the uniform format when sharing data with courts ordering an ignition interlock, with alcohol safety education programs, or with other treatment providers.

The Department of Public Safety shall require all vendors of drug testing programs approved under Section 63-11-31.1 to report test results in a consistent and uniform format as prescribed by the Forensics Laboratory. Vendors must report test results to the court on a monthly basis, except that a positive test or failure of the testing participant to submit to verification must be reported to the court within five (5) days of verification of the positive test or the failure to submit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 542, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 489, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 493, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 478, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 503, § 6, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 447, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2020.

§ 63-11-31.1.
Mississippi Forensics Laboratory to promulgate rules and regulations for court-ordered drug testing of DUI/other drug violators; evaluation of proposals made by and approval of vendors to be utilized by trial courts [Effective July 1, 2020].

The Mississippi Forensics Laboratory shall promulgate rules and regulations for court-ordered drug testing of DUI/other drug violators and shall approve which vendors are eligible to be utilized by the trial courts when ordering defendants to undergo drug testing as a condition of continuing to exercise the privilege to drive. The Forensics Laboratory may assess fees to the vendors, and shall prescribe the maximum costs to the offender for drug testing. The Forensics Laboratory may seek the advice of the State Intervention Court Advisory Committee in fulfilling these duties.

The Forensics Laboratory must evaluate proposals made by prospective vendors for acceptability, including, without limitation, the following factors:

A description of the method used for assessment;

The frequency with which the offender will be tested;

The procedure used by the vendor to ensure the accuracy of the test results;

The length of time allowed the offender to provide a biological sample after being given notice;

The frequency with which the vendor will make reports to the court;

The list of approved sites for the collection of biological samples for testing.

The Forensics Laboratory must promulgate regulations for the program and for vendors, including at a minimum:

That the offender must pay the cost of the testing program or, if the court finds the offender to be indigent, that the cost be paid from the Interlock Device Fund.

How indigent funds will be accessed by the vendors, and the maximum cost to the offender or the fund.

The Forensics Laboratory will provide the list of approved vendors, subject to continuous updating, to the Mississippi Judicial College for dissemination to the trial courts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 447, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2020, eff from and after July 1, 2020; Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 63-11-32.
Development, implementation and funding of driver improvement program for first offenders convicted of driving while intoxicated or under influence of another substance which impairs ability to operate motor vehicle.

The State Department of Public Safety in conjunction with the Governor’s Highway Safety Program, the State Board of Health, or any other state agency or institution shall develop and implement a driver improvement program for persons identified as first offenders convicted of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or another substance which had impaired such person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle, including provision for referral to rehabilitation facilities.

The program shall consist of a minimum of ten (10) hours of instruction. Each person who participates shall pay a nominal fee to defray a portion of the cost of the program.

Such assessments as are collected under subsection (2) of Section 99-19-73 shall be deposited in a special fund hereby created in the State Treasury and designated the “Mississippi Alcohol Safety Education Program Fund.” Monies deposited in such fund shall be expended by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning as authorized and appropriated by the Legislature to defray the costs of the Mississippi Alcohol Safety Education Program operated pursuant to the provisions of this section. Any revenue in the fund which is not encumbered at the end of the fiscal year shall lapse to the General Fund.

Such assessments as are collected under subsection (2) of Section 99-19-73 shall be deposited in a special fund hereby created in the State Treasury and designated the “Federal-State Alcohol Program Fund.” Monies deposited in such fund shall be expended by the Department of Public Safety as authorized and appropriated by the Legislature to defray the costs of alcohol and traffic safety programs. Any revenue in the fund which is not encumbered at the end of the fiscal year shall lapse to the General Fund.

Such assessments as are collected under subsection (2) of Section 99-19-73 shall be deposited in a special fund hereby created in the State Treasury and designated the “Mississippi Forensics Laboratory Implied Consent Law Fund.” Monies deposited in such fund shall be expended by the Department of Public Safety as authorized and appropriated by the Legislature to defray the costs of equipment replacement and operational support of the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory relating to enforcement of the Implied Consent Law. Any revenue in the fund which is not encumbered at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse to the General Fund but shall remain in the fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 408, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 305; Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 7; Laws, 1983, ch. 466, § 8; Laws, 1990, ch. 329, § 11; Laws, 1991, ch. 356 § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 12; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-11-33.
Interlock Device Fund; purpose; use of monies.

[Effective until July 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Interlock Device Fund. The purpose of the fund shall be to provide funding for the Driver’s License Bureau of the Department of Public Safety and also to provide funding assistance for ignition interlock devices for persons determined to be unable to afford the installation and maintenance of an ignition interlock device. Monies from the fund shall be distributed by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Department of Public Safety. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal-year limitations, and shall consist of:

Monies appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of funding the Driver’s License Bureau;

The interest accruing to the fund;

Monies paid by a person for deposit into the fund under Section 63-11-31; and

Monies received from such other sources as may be provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 493, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2018, ch. 447, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2020.

§ 63-11-33.
Interlock Device Fund; purpose; use of monies.

[Effective from and after July 1, 2020, this section will read:]

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Interlock Device Fund. The purpose of the fund shall be to provide funding for the Driver’s License Bureau of the Department of Public Safety and also to provide funding assistance for ignition interlock devices and court-ordered drug testing for persons determined to be unable to afford the installation and maintenance of an ignition interlock device or costs of drug testing. Monies from the fund shall be distributed by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Department of Public Safety. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal-year limitations, and shall consist of:

Monies appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of funding the Driver’s License Bureau;

The interest accruing to the fund;

Monies paid by a person for deposit into the fund under Section 63-11-31; and

Monies received from such other sources as may be provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 493, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2018, ch. 447, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2020.

§ 63-11-35.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

[Codes, 1942, §§ 8175-04, 8175-06, 8175-07; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, §§ 4, 6, 7]

§ 63-11-37.
Contents and disposition of record of conviction under § 63-11-30.

It shall be the duty of the trial judge, upon conviction of a person under Section 63-11-30, to mail or otherwise deliver in a method prescribed by the commissioner a true and correct copy of the traffic ticket, citation or affidavit evidencing the arrest that resulted in the conviction and a certified copy of the abstract of the court record within five (5) days to the Commissioner of Public Safety at Jackson, Mississippi. The trial judge in municipal and justice courts shall show on the docket and the trial judge in courts of record shall show on the minutes:

Whether a chemical test was given and the results of the test, if any; and

Whether conviction was based in whole or in part on the results of such a test.

The abstract of the court record shall show the date of the conviction, the results of the test if there was one, and the penalty, so that a record of same may be made by the Department of Public Safety.

For the purposes of Section 63-11-30, a bond forfeiture shall operate as and be considered as a conviction.

A trial court clerk who fails to provide a true and correct copy of the traffic ticket, citation or affidavit evidencing the arrest that resulted in the conviction and a copy of the abstract of the court record within five (5) days of the availability of that information as required in subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a civil violation and shall be fined One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), for which civil fine the clerk bears sole and personal responsibility. Each instance of failure is a separate violation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-08; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 8; Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 8; Laws, 1983, ch. 466, § 9; Laws, 1985, ch. 346; Laws, 1991, ch. 480, § 7; Laws, 2016, ch. 503, § 7; Laws, 2017, ch. 428, § 2, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2017.

§ 63-11-39.
Reduction of charges under chapter.

The court having jurisdiction or the prosecutor shall not reduce any charge under this chapter to a lesser charge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 500, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 13, eff from and after July 2, 1996.

§ 63-11-40.
Driving while driving license or privilege cancelled, suspended or revoked.

Any person whose driver’s license, or driving privilege has been cancelled, suspended or revoked under the provisions of this chapter and who drives any motor vehicle upon the highways, streets or public roads of this state, while such license or privilege is cancelled, suspended or revoked, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than forty-eight (48) hours nor more than six (6) months, and fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

The commissioner of public safety shall suspend the driver’s license or driving privilege of any person convicted under the provisions of this section for an additional six (6) months. Such suspension shall begin at the end of the original cancellation, suspension or revocation and run consecutively.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 466, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 63-11-41.
Admissibility in criminal prosecution of evidence of refusal to submit to chemical test.

If a person under arrest refuses to submit to a chemical test under the provisions of this chapter, evidence of refusal shall be admissible in any criminal action under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-22; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 22, eff from and after April 1, 1972.

§ 63-11-43.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1942, § 8175-23; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 23]

§ 63-11-45.
Denial of insurance coverage on ground of refusal to submit to test or upon basis of test results.

No coverage otherwise afforded under any policy of insurance shall be denied on the ground that any person has refused any test provided for by this chapter nor on the basis of the results of any such test. Any provision to such effect in any insurance policy hereinafter issued shall be void.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-25; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 29, eff from and after April 1, 1972.

§ 63-11-47.
Selection and purchase of equipment and supplies.

The Commissioner of Public Safety, acting in concert with the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory created pursuant to Section 45-1-17, is hereby expressly authorized and directed to determine the equipment and supplies which are adequate and necessary from both a medical and law enforcement standpoint for administration of this chapter. The Commissioner of Public Safety, upon receiving such recommendation from the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory, shall recommend an equipment standard for such equipment to the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration, using such a uniform standard for said equipment, shall advertise its intention of purchasing said equipment by one (1) publication in at least one (1) newspaper having general circulation in the State of Mississippi at least ten (10) days before the purchase of such equipment and supplies, and the advertisement shall clearly and distinctly describe the articles to be purchased, and shall receive sealed bids thereon which shall be opened in public at a time and place to be specified in the advertisement.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall accept the lowest and best bid for said equipment and supplies; in its discretion, it may reject any and all bids submitted. The lowest and best bid for said equipment and supplies accepted by the Department of Finance and Administration shall be the state-approved price of said equipment for purchase by the state, county and city governments.

Title to all such testing equipment in the state purchased hereunder shall remain in the Commissioner of Public Safety regardless of what entity pays the purchase price.

The state, counties and municipalities may purchase in the name of the Commissioner of Public Safety such equipment and supplies from other vendors of said equipment and supplies necessary to implement this chapter, provided they purchase of the same quality and standard as certified to the Department of Finance and Administration and approved by the department. However, such equipment and supplies shall not be purchased by the state, counties and municipalities unless it is at a price equivalent to or lower than that approved by the Department of Finance and Administration, pursuant to the bid procedure as outlined herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-26; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 30; Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 13; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 263; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§§ 63-11-49 through 63-11-53.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2016, ch. 503, §§ 10-12, effective from and after October 1, 2016.

§63-11-49. [Laws, 1992, ch. 500, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 14, eff from and after July 2, 1996.]

§63-11-51. [Laws, 1992, ch. 500, § 3; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 15, eff from and after July 2, 1996.]

§63-11-53. [Laws, 1992, ch. 500, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 16, eff from and after July 2, 1996.]